Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 186A Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System
186A.297.
Filing of affidavit of conversion to real estate when manufactured home is permanently affixed to land — Requirements for surrender of certificate of title.

When a manufactured home is or is to be permanently affixed to real estate, the owner may execute and file an affidavit of conversion to real estate with the county clerk of the county in which the real estate is located. The affidavit shall attest to the fact that the home has been or will be permanently affixed to the real estate and be accompanied by a surrender of the Kentucky certificate of title. The county clerk shall file the affidavit of conversion to real estate in the miscellaneous record book.

A county clerk shall not accept a surrender of a Kentucky certificate of title which displays an unreleased lien unless it is accompanied by:

A release of the lien; or

An affidavit, signed under oath by the attorney who satisfied the liens noted on the Kentucky certificate of title, attesting that all liens noted on the Kentucky certificate of title have been paid. An affidavit filed by an attorney under this paragraph may only be signed by an attorney licensed to practice law in the Commonwealth.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not excuse a lender who placed a lien on the certificate of title from filing a release of the lien.

Upon receipt of the information identified in subsection (2) of this section, the county clerk shall accept the affidavit of conversion and the surrender of the Kentucky certificate of title.

In the event of an inaccurate or fraudulent affidavit, the title surrender becomes null and void.

The county clerk shall be held harmless if he or she relies upon receipt of the information identified in subsection (2) of this section.

When the county clerk files the affidavit of conversion to real estate, the county clerk shall furnish a copy to the property valuation administrator for inclusion in the real property tax rolls of the county. A filing of an affidavit of conversion to real estate and a surrender of a Kentucky certificate of title shall be deemed a conversion of the property as an improvement to the real estate upon which it is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 166, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2022 ch. 113, § 3, effective July 14, 2022.

186A.298.
Filing of affidavit of severance from real estate for manufactured home previously converted to real estate.

The owner of a manufactured home that has been converted to real estate in accordance with KRS

186A.297

may detach or sever the home from the real property only by filing an affidavit of severance with the clerk of the county in which the affidavit of conversion originally took place and in which the real estate is located. The affidavit of severance shall include the following information:

The manufacturer and, if applicable, the model name of the manufactured home;

The legal description of the real property on which the manufactured home is or was placed, with the source of title setting forth the book and page number of how the owner of the real estate acquired the property;

The book and page number where the previous affidavit of conversion was filed of record;

A Class B1 or B2 Seal as required under KRS

227.600

;

Certification of an attorney that, as of the date of the titling of the severance, there are no security interests or liens in the manufactured home that have not been released by the secured party and that the title to the real estate is marketable, free, and clear of liens, or certification of any holder of a security interest in the manufactured home of:

The amount of any existing security interest; and

The secured party’s consent to issuance of a title;

The owner’s affidavit that the manufactured home has previously been or will be removed from the described real estate within thirty (30) days of the date of filing the affidavit of conversion, and that, before moving the manufactured home the owner will apply for and receive;

A certificate of title as required under KRS

186A.070

; and

A manufactured home registration as required under KRS

186.675

; and

There shall be a limit of one (1) affidavit of severance issued to an owner on a property.

When the county clerk files the affidavit of severance, the county clerk shall provide a copy to:

The property valuation administrator for adjustment of the real property tax rolls of the county; and

The Transportation Cabinet, Department of Vehicle Regulation.

An owner who fails to file an affidavit of severance prior to removal of the manufactured home shall be liable for actual damages or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater, payable to any first lien holder of record, or if no such lien holder exists, to be payable to the clerk of the county in which the affidavit of conversion first took place, upon notice to the clerk that the manufactured home was not removed within thirty (30) days of the date of filing of the affidavit of severance.

The county clerk shall receive a fee of sixteen dollars ($16) for the service provided under this section.

If the owner of the manufactured home provides inaccurate or fraudulent information to the county clerk, the clerk shall not be held liable in any subsequent action relating to the severance of the manufactured home from the real estate.

For the purposes of this section, “owner” means the party who holds the legal title to the real estate where the manufactured home is located prior to being moved. It shall not include the party who is acquiring the manufactured home.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 98, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

186A.300.
Possession of blank, uncompleted or partially executed title and registration documents prohibited — Exceptions.

No person, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall have in his possession any blank, uncompleted, or partially executed “certificate of title and registration,” “certificate of registration,” “certificate of title,” or other similarly styled form or document, whether genuine or counterfeit, of this or any other state or country, which is of a type that, when genuine and properly issued, evidences ownership of a vehicle under the laws of this or another state or country, and surrender of which is required in order to sell, transfer, register or title a motor vehicle or trailer in this state.

A person who possesses forms or documents of the type described in subsection (1) of this section, is not in violation of this section if he:

Is an employee of a manufacturer or printer of such forms or documents and possesses such forms or documents in the normal course of the business of design or manufacture of them in connection with bid invitation, bid, or contract with a governmental agency related to supplying such forms for governmental use.

Is an employee of a shipper, or agency, under whose direction such forms are being shipped or delivered to a state or local agency charged with receiving, distributing or issuing such forms or documents, when they are in a container sealed under governmental direction.

Is an employee of a state agency who possesses such forms or documents in the course of carrying out his official duties when his duties are to handle such forms or documents.

Is a county clerk, or employee of a county clerk whose official work duties require the handling of such forms or documents, and he possesses them within the confines of the county clerk’s office or official storage space or immediately incidental to placing them in such places.

Possesses such form or document and it is prominently and indelibly marked on its face either: specimen, or void, or sample.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 57, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.305.
Alteration or removal of motor vehicle identification number prohibited.

No person shall intentionally remove, deface, cover, destroy, alter, or obscure any vehicle identification number, or other distinguishing number, of a motor vehicle or trailer or any part thereof in this state, without written authorization from the Department of Kentucky State Police, nor shall any person place or stamp, in place of the original manufacturer’s serial, motor, or other number or mark upon a vehicle, any number except one assigned thereto by the Department of Vehicle Regulation under the provisions of KRS

186.1911

or authorized agency of another state.

This section does not prohibit the restoration by an owner of the original vehicle identification number when the restoration is authorized by the Department of Kentucky State Police, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing in the ordinary course of business numbers or marks upon new motor vehicles or new parts thereof.

This section shall not apply to a scrap processor who loads, unloads, crushes, flattens, destroys, grinds up, handles, shreds, or otherwise reduces a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part into metallic scrap for the purpose of recycling such metallic content.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 58, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 207, effective June 26, 2007.

186A.310.
Selling or receiving of vehicle with identification number removed or altered prohibited.

No person shall knowingly buy, sell, offer for sale, receive, or have in his possession, any titled motor vehicle or trailer or component part thereof, from which the original manufacturer’s vehicle identification number, or serial number, has been removed, defaced, altered, obscured or destroyed, unless such vehicle or component part has attached thereto an identification number assigned or approved by the Department of Vehicle Regulation under the provisions of KRS

186.1911

or authorized agency of another state in lieu of the manufacturer’s number.

Whenever such vehicle or component part comes into the custody of a peace officer it shall be forfeited under the procedure established in KRS

500.090

. Nothing in this section shall, however, preclude the return of such vehicle or parts to the lawful owner thereof following presentation of satisfactory evidence of ownership and assignment of an identification number by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 59, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.315.
Possession of manufacturer’s identification number plates prohibited — Exceptions.

No person shall have in his possession a manufacturer’s vehicle identification number plate unless it is attached to the vehicle, or vehicle part, to which it was originally affixed by the manufacturer, nor shall any person have any facsimile of such a plate.

This section shall not prohibit possession of legitimate plates by persons:

Whose possession is incident to a contract to supply them to a manufacturer of new motor vehicles, or when such plates are in the possession of a manufacturer of new vehicles, or such manufacturer’s employee, who possesses them within the scope of his work when his work involved the manufacture or storage of such plates, for legitimate placement upon newly manufactured vehicles, legitimate affixing of such plates upon newly manufactured vehicles, or legitimate affixing of a replacement plate.

Who possess such plate immediately incident to transferring it from being legitimately attached to a wrecked part or portion of a vehicle to a replacement part or portion for installation on, or installed on, the same vehicle on which the plate was originally placed by the manufacturer, when such possession and transfer is authorized in writing by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

Who are authorized in writing, by the commissioner of the Department of Vehicle Regulation under the provisions of KRS

186.1911

to possess such plates.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 60, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.320.
Duties of peace officer in the event a stolen vehicle is located.

When any peace officer has probable cause to believe that a motor vehicle or trailer, or any component part of such vehicle is stolen, he shall impound such vehicle or part and notify its lawful owner, and when applicable, the agency to which the theft was reported, of the recovery of such vehicle or part and where it may be claimed.

A vehicle or component part thereof which has been impounded pursuant to this section shall be released to its lawful owner when such owner presents satisfactory evidence of his ownership.

A vehicle or component part thereof that has been impounded under this section, and which has not been claimed within ninety (90) days following notice of recovery to the owner, or if the owner cannot be located after a reasonable effort, within ninety (90) days following impoundment, is forfeited and shall be disposed of in accordance with procedures set forth in KRS

500.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 61, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.325.
Trafficking in stolen vehicles or stolen vehicle parts.

Any person or entity knowingly in possession or control of two (2) or more motor vehicles or trailers or their major component parts or assemblies such as, but not limited to, an engine, transmission, chassis, frame, front clip, rear clip:

That are stolen; or

Have had their identity obscured, removed or altered, except as an immediate result of the final destruction by crushing, flattening, grinding up, or shredding of a vehicle or vehicle part for purpose of recycling its metallic content; or

Have stolen parts on them; or

Are comprised of any combination of the above;

shall be deemed to be trafficking in stolen vehicles or stolen vehicle parts.

Trafficking in stolen vehicles or stolen vehicle parts is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 62, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.330.
Duties of law enforcement officer in the event of arrest for violation of trafficking in stolen vehicles or stolen parts.

Upon the arrest of any person or entity for violation of KRS

186A.325

, the law enforcement officer may cause the seizure, pending disposition by the court as provided by subsection (2) of this section, of:

All vehicles or vehicle parts, held in violation of KRS 186A.310(1) or

186A.325

;

All vehicles and other equipment used to transport property in violation of KRS 186A.325;

All tools, equipment, and other materials, and all real and personal property used in furtherance of a violation of KRS 186A.325; and

All money or other proceeds gained from the violation of KRS 186A.325.

Upon the conviction of any person or entity for violation of KRS

186A.325

, all items seized in accordance with subsection (1) of this section may be forfeited to the state in a manner consistent with procedures for forfeiture set forth in KRS

500.090

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 63, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.335.
Salvage titles — Conditions for issuance. [Renumbered.]

186A.340.
Appeal of administrative action to court.

Any person aggrieved by any administrative action pursuant to this chapter or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, may appeal such action to a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 65, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.345.
Definitions to be consistent with KRS 186.010.

Unless the context requires otherwise, terms used in this chapter shall be defined, where applicable, as provided by KRS

186.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 67, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.350.
Fees credited to trust and agency account.

All fees to be credited to the state shall be deposited to a trust and agency account within the transportation fund to be used in defraying the cabinet’s costs and expenses of administering a vehicle titling program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 68, effective July 15, 1982.